Washington statutes.
RCW 19.270.080

Chapter 19.86 RCW not affected.

Chapter 500, Laws of 2005 does not add to, contract, alter, or amend any cause of action allowed under chapter 19.86 RCW and does not affect in any way the application of chapter 19.86 RCW to any future case or fact pattern.

[ 2005 c 500 s 8.]